Hawaii statutes.
§352D-4 Establishment; purpose. There
is established within the department of human services for administrative
purposes only the office of youth services. The office of youth services is
established to provide services and programs for youth at risk under one
umbrella agency in order to facilitate optimum service delivery, to prevent
delinquency, and to reduce the incidence of recidivism among juveniles through
the provision of prevention, rehabilitation, and treatment services. The
office shall also be responsible for program planning and development,
intake/assessment, oversight, as well as consultation, technical assistance,
and staff training relating to the delivery of services.

The office shall provide a continuum of
services as follows:

(1) An integrated intake/assessment and case
management system;

(2) The necessary educational, vocational, social
counseling and mental health services;

(3) Community-based shelter and residential
facilities;

(4) Oversight of youth services; and

(5) Other programs which encourage the development of
positive self-images and useful skills in such youth.

The executive director of the office of youth
services shall submit annual reports to the legislature no later than twenty
days prior to the convening of each regular session, reporting the services or
programs funded pursuant to this section, the number of youth served by each
service or program, and the results of the services or programs funded.

To this end, on July 1, 1991, this office
shall assume the responsibilities for juvenile corrections functions, which
were temporarily placed in the department of corrections pursuant to Act 338 of
1987. These functions shall include, but not be limited to, all
responsibilities, under chapter 352, for the Hawaii youth correctional
facilities. [L 1989, c 375, pt of §1; am L 2014, c 201, §5]

Note

The 2014 amendment applies to delinquent behavior committed
on or after July 1, 2014. L 2014, c 201, §21.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next